District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0324.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
22 act may be cited as the “Pass-Through Entities Income Tax and Tax Credit on Certain S
23 Corporations and Partnerships Amendment Act of 2025”.
24 Sec. 2. Chapter 18 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
25 follows:
26 (a) The table of contents is amended by adding a subchapter VII-C to read as follows:
27 “Subchapter VII-C. Pass-Through Entities Tax on Certain S Corporations and
28 Partnerships.
29 “47-1807.71. Definitions.
30 “47-1807.72. Pass-Through Entities Tax on Certain S Corporations and Partnerships.
31 “47-1807.73. Applicability Date.
32 (b) A new subchapter VII-C is added to read as follows:
33 “47-1807.71. Definitions.
1

34 “For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:
35 “(1) “Distributable cash flow” means taxable income reportable by a pass–
36 through entity on its federal income tax return for the taxable year:
37 “(A) Adjusted, in the case of an entity using the accrual method of
38 accounting to report federal taxable income, to reflect the amount of taxable income that would
39 have been reported under the cash method of accounting;
40 “(B) Increased by the sum of:
41 “(i) Cash receipts for the taxable year that are not includable in the
42 gross income of the entity, including capital contributions and loan proceeds;
43 “(ii) Amounts allowable to the entity for the taxable year as
44 deductions for depreciation, amortization, and depletion; and
45 “(iii) The decrease, if any, in the entity’s liability reserve as of the
46 end of the taxable year; and
47 “(C) Decreased by the sum of:
48 “(i) Cash expenditures for the taxable year that are not deductible
49 in computing the taxable income of the entity, not including distributions to shareholders,
50 partners, or members; and
51 “(ii) The increase, if any, in the entity’s liability reserve as of the
52 end of the taxable year.
53 “(2) “Liability reserve” means accrued unpaid liabilities that are not deductible in
54 computing taxable income.
55 “(3) “Member” means:
56 “(A) A shareholder of an S corporation;
2

57 “(B) A general or limited partner of a partnership, limited partnership, or
58 limited liability partnership;
59 “(C) A member of a limited liability company; or
60 “(D) A beneficiary of a business trust or statutory trust.
61 “(4) “Nonresident entity” means an entity that is not formed under the laws of the
62 District of Columbia and is not qualified by or registered with the Office of the Chief Financial
63 Officer created by § 1-204.24a to do business in the District of Columbia.
64 “(5) Nonresident taxable income” means that portion of the entire net income of
65 every nonresident which is subject to tax under §§ 47-1808.01 to 47-1808.06.
66 “(6) “Pass–through entity” means:
67 “(A) An S corporation;
68 “(B) A partnership;
69 “(C) A limited liability company that is not taxed as a corporation under
70 this title; or
71 “(D) A business trust or statutory trust that is not taxed as a corporation
72 under this title.
73 “(7) “Pass–through entity’s taxable income” means the portion of a pass–through
74 entity’s income under the federal Internal Revenue Code, calculated without regard to any
75 deduction for taxes based on net income that are imposed by any state or political subdivision of
76 a state, that is derived from or reasonably attributable to the trade or business of the pass–through
77 entity in the District of Columbia.
78 “47-1807.72. Pass-Through Entities Income Tax on Certain S Corporations and
79 Partnerships.
3

80 “(a)(1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, in addition to any other tax imposed
81 under this title, a tax is imposed on each pass–through entity.
82 “(2) Each pass–through entity:
83 “(A) Shall pay the tax imposed under paragraph (1) of this subsection with
84 respect to the distributive shares or pro rata shares of the nonresident and nonresident entity
85 members of the pass–through entity; or
86 “(B) May elect to pay the tax imposed under paragraph (1) of this
87 subsection with respect to the distributive shares or pro rata shares of all members of the pass–
88 through entity.
89 “(b)(1) With respect to a pass–through entity that pays the tax imposed under subsection
90 (a)(1) of this section in accordance with subsection (a)(2)(A) of this section, the tax shall be
91 treated as a tax imposed on the nonresident or nonresident entity members that is paid on behalf
92 of the nonresidents or nonresident entities by the pass–through entity.
93 “(2) The Mayor shall provide by regulation for the treatment of the tax imposed
94 under subsection (a) of this section that is paid on behalf of a nonresident entity member that is
95 itself a pass–through entity.
96 “(3) With respect to a pass-through entity that pays the tax imposed under
97 subsection (a)(1) of this section in accordance with subsection (a)(2)(B) of this section, the tax
98 shall be treated as a tax imposed on the pass-through entity itself.
99 “(c)(1) With respect to a pass-through entity that pays the tax imposed under subsection
100 (a)(1) of this section in accordance with subsection (a)(2)(A) of this section, the tax imposed is
101 the sum of:
4

102 “(A) A rate equal to the sum of the rate of the tax imposed under the top
103 marginal District of Columbia tax rate for individuals under § 47-1806.03 applied to the sum of
104 each nonresident individual member’s distributive share or pro rata share of the pass-through
105 entity’s nonresident taxable income; and
106 “(B) The rate of the tax for a corporation under § 47-1807.02 applied to
107 the sum of each nonresident entity member’s distributive share or pro rata share of the pass-
108 through entity’s nonresident taxable income.
109 “(2) With respect to a pass-through entity that pays the tax imposed under
110 subsection (a)(1) of this section in accordance with subsection (a)(2)(B) of this section, the tax
111 imposed is the sum of:
112 “(A) A rate equal to the sum of the rate of the tax imposed under the top
113 marginal District of Columbia tax rate for individuals under § 47-1806.03 applied to the sum of
114 each individual member’s distributive share or pro rata share of the pass-through entity’s taxable
115 income; and
116 “(B) The rate of the tax for a corporation under § 47-1807.02 applied to
117 the sum of each entity member’s distributive share or pro rata share of the pass-through entity’s
118 taxable income.
119 “(3) The tax required to be paid for any taxable year by a pass-through entity may
120 not exceed:
121 “(A) With respect to a pass-through entity that pays the tax imposed under
122 subsection (a)(1) of this section in accordance with subsection (a)(2)(A) of this section, the sum
123 of all of the nonresident and nonresident entity members’ shares of the pass-through entity’s
124 distributable cash flow; and
5

125 “(B) With respect to a pass-through entity that pays the tax imposed under
126 subsection (a)(1) of this section in accordance with subsection (a)(2)(B) of this section, the sum
127 of all of the members’ shares of the pass-through entity’s distributable cash flow.
128 “(d) In accordance with § 47-1806.04, each member may claim a credit against the tax
129 imposed on the member for the member’s proportionate share of the tax paid by the pass-through
130 entity under subsection (a) of this section.
131 “(e)(1)(A) The tax imposed under subsection (a)(1) of this section that is paid in
132 accordance with subsection (a)(2)(A) of this section and for which no election is made under
133 subsection (a)(2)(B) of this section does not apply with respect to the distributive share or pro
134 rata share of a member that is itself a pass-through entity formed under the laws of the District of
135 Columbia or qualified by or registered with the with the Office of the Chief Financial Officer
136 created by § 1-204.24a to do business in the District of Columbia.
137 “(B) A member of a pass-through entity that is itself a pass-through entity
138 as described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall itself comply with the provisions of this
139 section.
140 “(2) The tax imposed under subsection (a)(1) of this section that is paid in
141 accordance with subsection (a)(2)(A) of this section and for which no election is made under
142 subsection (a)(2)(B) of this section does not apply with respect to the direct or indirect
143 distributive share or pro rata share of a member that is:
144 “(A) A real estate investment trust as defined in § 856 of the Internal
145 Revenue Code; or
146 “(B) An entity that is exempt from taxation under with § 501 of the
147 Internal Revenue Code.
6

148 “(f) The Mayor may promulgate rules for:
149 “(1) The filing of composite returns by a pass-through entity on behalf of its
150 nonresident and nonresident entity members; and
151 “(2) Application of or exemption from the tax imposed under subsection (a) of
152 this section for a pass-through entity:
153 “(A) That files a composite return on behalf of nonresident and
154 nonresident entity members; or
155 “(B) The entity members of which are tax exempt.
156 “(g)(1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, if a partnership fails to pay the tax
157 when due, the tax may be collected from the partners under the law applicable to debts of the
158 partnership, with the partnership and partners having rights of contribution against any partner on
159 whose behalf the tax is paid.
160 “(2) Unless it is established by the Mayor that the partner participated in a pattern
161 of distributions to one or more partners with the intention of defeating the partnership liability
162 for the tax imposed under subsection (a) of this section, any partner otherwise liable under
163 paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be liable for the tax imposed on the partnership only to the
164 extent of distributions from the partnership to that partner after the tax was due to be paid by the
165 partnership.
166 “(h) Except as provided in § 47-1806.04, nothing in this section limits or affects in any
167 way the liability of an individual nonresident member or a nonresident entity member for the tax
168 imposed on the individual nonresident or nonresident entity under § 47-1807.72.
169 “(i) The tax imposed under subsection (a)(1) of this section that is paid in accordance
170 with subsection (a)(2)(B) of this section and for which no election is made under subsetion
7

171 (a)(2)(B) of this section does not apply to a publicly traded pass-through entity that has agreed to
172 file with the Mayor an annual information return reporting the name, address, taxpayer
173 identification number, and other information requested by the Mayor of each nonresident or
174 nonresident entity member whose distributive share or pro rata share of the pass-through entity’s
175 nonresident taxable income for the taxable year exceeds $500.
176 “47-1807.73. Applicability date.
177 “Sections 47-1807.71 through 47-1807.73 shall apply for the income tax years beginning
178 after December 31, 2023.”.
179 (c) Section 47-1806.04 is amended by adding a new subsection (h) to read as follows:
180 “(h) A member of a pass–through entity, as defined in § 47-1807.71(6), may claim a
181 credit against the income tax for a taxable year in the amount of tax paid by a pass–through
182 entity under § 47-1807.72 that is attributable to the member’s share of the pass–through entity’s
183 taxable income, as defined in § 47-1807.71(7).
184 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
185 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
186 statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
187 October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
188 Sec. 4. Effective date.
189 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
190 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
191 as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
192 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
8